District of Columbia statutes.
50-2421.12

Rulemaking authority.

The Directors of the Department of Public Works (“DPW”) and the Department of Motor Vehicles (“DMV”) are authorized, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, to promulgate, amend or repeal rules, or establish or modify cost-based fees that are within the scope of their individual authority in order to implement the provisions of this subchapter, through separate or joint rulemakings. If the District enters into contracts with towing companies, or other contractors, that provide for such companies to receive full or salvage title to unclaimed vehicles, the Director of DPW or the DMV may promulgate rules to implement the transfers consistent with the provisions of this subchapter.

Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-35, § 12, 50 DCR 6579

History

For temporary (90 day) addition of this section, see § 12 of Removal and Disposition of Abandoned and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-171, October 6, 2003, 50 DCR 9163).

Emergency Legislation